Connecticut, session 2026, SB00242.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective October 1, 2026) The Consumer Counsel shall
conduct a study that analyzes the feasibility of requiring that, for a
consumer who elects to switch electric suppliers pursuant to section 16-
245q of the general statutes, such switch be (1) made not later than three
business days after the consumer notifies such consumer's electric
distribution company of such consumer's election to make such switch,
and (2) reflected on the customer's bill in the subsequent billing cycle. In
determining feasibility pursuant to this section, the Consumer Counsel
shall solicit written comment from each electric distribution company.
Not later than January 15, 2027, the Consumer Counsel shall submit a
report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general
statutes, containing the Consumer Counsel's findings to the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to energy.
LCO No. 1598 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 242
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section